Nebraska, session 109, LB526.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cryptocurrency mining means validating transactions for addition to a
blockchain distributed ledger;
(b) Cryptocurrency mining operation means any facility of one megawatt in
size or greater that conducts cryptocurrency mining; and
(c) Public power supplier means a public power district, municipal
electric utility, or any other government entity providing electric service.
(2) A public power supplier may impose requirements on any cryptocurrency
mining operation for the cost of infrastructure upgrades necessitated by such
operations, including, but not limited to:
(a) Requiring direct payment or a letter of credit from such operation for
such cost; or
(b) Imposing terms and conditions on such operation.
(3) Requirements imposed pursuant to this section shall be fair,
reasonable, and not unduly discriminatory.
(4) Before any requirement is imposed pursuant to this section, the public
power supplier shall conduct a load study to determine the costs, impacts, and
infrastructure upgrades necessitated by the cryptocurrency mining operation.
(5) Any person intending to install a cryptocurrency mining operation is
responsible for notifying the local public power supplier of such intent, and
such operation is subject to the interconnection requirements of such supplier.
(6) Each public power supplier shall make available to the public on the
supplier's website the number of cryptocurrency mining operations under the
jurisdiction of the supplier and the annual energy usage of each operation.
(7) A cryptocurrency mining operation shall allow a public power supplier
to interrupt such operation's electric service according to such supplier's
established rate schedules and policies.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
-1-